District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Schedule of Fines Rulemaking Approval and Authority Emergency Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2. In accordance with section 105(a)(1) of the District of Columbia Traffic
Adjudication Act of 1978, effective September 12, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-104; D.C. Official Code §
50-2301.05(a)(1)) (“Section 105(a)(1)”), the Council approves the proposed rules issued by the
Director of the District Department of Transportation to amend the schedule of fines set forth in
section 2600 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (18 DCMR § 2600),
published in the District of Columbia Register on June 26, 2026, at 73 DCR 8942, and the
Director of the District Department of Transportation may, notwithstanding Section 105(a)(1),
issue such rules on an emergency basis pursuant to section 105(c) of the District of Columbia
Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1024; D.C. Official Code §
2-505(c)).
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2